Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-188
Vehicle identification inspections; restriction on authority to inspect.

A holder of a certificate of training who is an employee of a licensee as determined by the department shall not inspect any vehicle which is not owned by his or her sponsoring licensee. A holder of a certificate of training who is a licensee shall not inspect any vehicle which he or she does not own.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 88.